District of Columbia statutes.
22-3801

Repealed

Indecent acts with children

Repealed.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 501(b), 42 DCR 53
Furlough eligibility, convictions under this section, see § 24-251.02.
1981 Ed., §§ 22-3501, 22-3502.